Utah statutes.
53-3-802.   Definitions.

As used in this part:

(1)  "Adult" means a person 21 years of age or older.

(2)  "Identification card" means a card for identification issued under this part.

(3)  "Minor" means a person younger than 21 years of age.



Renumbered and Amended by Chapter 234, 1993 General Session

